ava_pn.lexd
Буйнакск:Буйнакск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""
Омск:Омск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""
Кисловодск:Кисловодск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""
Новосибирск:Новосибирск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""
Челябинск:Челябинск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""
Минск:Минск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""
Каспийск:Каспийск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; # ""

Америкаялъул Цолъарал Штатал:Америкаялъул Цолъарал Штатал NP-TOP-PL ; 

Ставрополь:Ставрополь NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Волгоград:Волгоград NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Владикавказ:Владикавказ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

ЦӀумада:ЦӀумада NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ЧӀарада:ЧӀарада NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Унсоколо:Унсоколо NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хьаргаби:Хьаргаби NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Зехида:Зехида NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Къорода:Къорода NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Зирани:Зирани NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Тарумовка:Тарумовка NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Шамилхъала:Шамилхъала NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Сергохъала:Сергохъала NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хумторхъала:Хумторхъала NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Лъаратӏа:Лъаратӏа NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хинлъимитӏа:Хинлъимитӏа NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Салтӏа:Салтӏа NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Лаваша:Лаваша NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Эсадия:Эсадия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Хайдакъ:Хайдакъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ГӀаймакиб:ГӀаймакиб NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ЧӀохъ:ЧӀохъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гьоцӏалъ:Гьоцӏалъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Рихьуниб:Рихьуниб NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Бежтӏа:Бежтӏа NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
Аргентина:Аргентина NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гуржия:Гуржия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; # ""
ГӀахъуша:ГӀахъуша NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Магӏлиб:Магӏлиб NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гъуниб:Гъуниб NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Къахӏиб:Къахӏиб NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ГӀаймаки:ГӀаймаки NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Рихьуни:Рихьуни NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Сочи:Сочи NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Мугӏрузул:Мугӏрузул NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Табасаран:Табасаран NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ХӀасан:ХӀасан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Унсоколо:Унсоколо NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Кембридж:Кембридж NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гъизляр:Гъизляр NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гумбет:Гумбет NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Мухӏарамкент:Мухӏарамкент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Гъаякент:Гъаякент NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Бабаюрт:Бабаюрт NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Сугъралъ:Сугъралъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
ГӀахьвахъ:ГӀахьвахъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Хунзахъ:Хунзахъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Болъихъ:Болъихъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Кьохъ:Кьохъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Львовское:Львовское NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Первомайское:Первомайское NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ;  # ""
Майданское:Майданское NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Комсомольское:Комсомольское NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Октябрьское:Октябрьское NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""

Макка:Макка NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""
Мадина:Мадина NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; # ""


АО:АО NP-TOP-ACSH ; # ""
ЮФО:ЮФО NP-TOP-ACSH ; # ""
АЦШ:АЦШ NP-TOP-ACSH ; # ""
СССР:СССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""
РСФСР:РСФСР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""
ССР:ССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""
ДР:ДР NP-TOP-ACSH ; # ""
РФ:РФ NP-TOP-ACSH ; # ""
ДАССР:ДАССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""
Казах ССР:Казах ССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""
Киргиз ССР:Киргиз ССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""
ЧИАССР:ЧИАССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; # ""

СПИД:СПИД NP-AL-KPSS ; # "" # FIXME:checkPOS
ВИЧ:ВИЧ NP-AL-KPSS ; # "" FIXME:checkPOS

ФАП:ФАП NP-AL-GES ; # ""

НКВД:НКВД NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ДНЦ:ДНЦ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ИЯЛИ:ИЯЛИ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ЭТА:ЭТА NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
РКЦ:РКЦ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ЮНЕСКО:ЮНЕСКО NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ГИБДД:ГИБДД NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
МВД:МВД NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ГАИ:ГАИ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
РДНТ:РДНТ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ФСБ:ФСБ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
РАН:РАН NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
КПСС:КПСС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ДПС:ДПС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
МСЭК:МСЭК NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
МСЭ:МСЭ NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
УФНС:УФНС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ООН:ООН NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ЛДПР:ЛДПР NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ДУМД:ДУМД NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ФОМС:ФОМС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
МЧС:МЧС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ГЭС:ГЭС NP-AL-GES ; # ""
ДГУ:ДГУ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ДГПУ:ДГПУ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
СПК:СПК NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ДнепроГЭС:ДнепроГЭС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
ЧӀикӏабГЭС:ЧӀикӏабГЭС NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
КамАЗ:КамАЗ NP-AL-KPSS ; # ""
РусГидро:РусГидро NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ЕГЭ:ЕГЭ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
РОВД:РОВД NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
МО:МО NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""
ДЮСШ:ДЮСШ NP-AL-NKVD ; # ""


Фатима:Фатима NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Ума:Ума NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Эльмира:Эльмира NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Оксана:Оксана NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Татьяна:Татьяна NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Заира:Заира NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Диана:Диана NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Зарема:Зарема NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Асма:Асма NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Элеонора:Элеонора NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Машидат:Машидат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Маймунат:Маймунат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Сапият:Сапият NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Марьян:Марьян NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Маржанат:Маржанат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Гулжанат:Гулжанат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Марина:Марина NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Ольга:Ольга NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Перзият:Перзият NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Патӏимат:Патӏимат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""

Людмила:Людмила NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Алла:Алла NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Светлана:Светлана NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Мадина:Мадина NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Екатерина:Екатерина NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Гульнара:Гульнара NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Надира:Надира NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Зульфия:Зульфия NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Фазу:Фазу NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""
Залму:Залму NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; # ""

Зайнаб:Зайнаб NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Марьям:Марьям NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Хадижат:Хадижат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Аминат:Аминат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Сидрат:Сидрат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
ГӀайшат:ГӀайшат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Сабигат:Сабигат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Марият:Марият NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Мариям:Мариям NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Асият:Асият NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""
Шамсият:Шамсият NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; # ""


Арутюнов:Арутюнов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Абулайсов:Абулайсов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Атаев:Атаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Дахӏадаев:Дахӏадаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Къебедхӏажиев:Къебедхӏажиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Сергеев:Сергеев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Гьиматов:Гьиматов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мавраев:Мавраев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Соболев:Соболев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шаймиев:Шаймиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Малачиев:Малачиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Тишков:Тишков NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ХӀусейнов:ХӀусейнов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шапиев:Шапиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Дударов:Дударов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Султангӏалиев:Султангӏалиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Кандаров:Кандаров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шамилов:Шамилов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Никӏамухӏамадов:Никӏамухӏамадов  NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Гъазимухӏамадов:Гъазимухӏамадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Белетов:Белетов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Ткачев:Ткачев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мухӏамаев:Мухӏамаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Илясов:Илясов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабдуразакъов:ГӀабдуразакъов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Цораев:Цораев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Къурачев:Къурачев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Даганов:Даганов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀумаханов:ГӀумаханов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Патахӏов:Патахӏов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀумаров:ГӀумаров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Къадиров:Къадиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Амиров:Амиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Султӏанов:Султӏанов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Къурбанов:Къурбанов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ХӀусенов:ХӀусенов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Камалов:Камалов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Махӏмудов:Махӏмудов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Султанбегов:Султанбегов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Гьитӏинов:Гьитӏинов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Ражабов:Ражабов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Казбеков:Казбеков NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Насрудинов:Насрудинов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Магомедов:Магомедов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Медведев:Медведев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мусаев:Мусаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мухӏамадов:Мухӏамадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Каримов:Каримов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Гъалбацӏов:Гъалбацӏов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ХӀамзатов:ХӀамзатов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ХӀажиев:ХӀажиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Хазамов:Хазамов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀалиев:ГӀалиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Ахӏмадов:Ахӏмадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Рамазанов:Рамазанов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ХӀасанов:ХӀасанов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Сулейманов:Сулейманов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Ибрагьимов:Ибрагьимов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Магьдиев:Магьдиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ХӀажимурадов:ХӀажимурадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Расулов:Расулов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабдулаев:ГӀабдулаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабдулгъапуров:ГӀабдулгъапуров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабдулкаримов:ГӀабдулкаримов NP-COG-OV ; # ""

Къебедов:Къебедов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабашилов:ГӀабашилов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Махӏатӏов:Махӏатӏов NP-COG-OV; # ""
Изудинов:Изудинов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Дациев:Дациев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Муртазагӏалиев:Муртазагӏалиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀизудинов:ГӀизудинов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Гьиматов:Гьиматов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀисаев:ГӀисаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Нурмухӏамадов:Нурмухӏамадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Сагӏидов:Сагӏидов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Юсупов:Юсупов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀусманов:ГӀусманов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Дахадаев:Дахадаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Сагитов:Сагитов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Махӏатов:Махӏатов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Къурбангӏалиев:Къурбангӏалиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Бисавгӏалиев:Бисавгӏалиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Батиров:Батиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мамаев:Мамаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Вагьабов:Вагьабов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Борзиев:Борзиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шихсагӏидов:Шихсагӏидов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Дибиров:Дибиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шамхалов:Шамхалов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шагӏбанов:Шагӏбанов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Хъараев:Хъараев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Резанов:Резанов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Манапов:Манапов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Казиев:Казиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабдулатӏипов:ГӀабдулатӏипов NP-COG-OV ; # ""

Абакаров:Абакаров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Абулкъасумов:Абулкъасумов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Асиятилов:Асиятилов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Аскерханов:Аскерханов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Бахӏандов:Бахӏандов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀабдулмуслимов:ГӀабдулмуслимов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀазизов:ГӀазизов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀаламов:ГӀаламов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀамирилаев:ГӀамирилаев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ГӀисалмухӏамадов:ГӀисалмухӏамадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Крашенинников:Крашенинников NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мухуров:Мухуров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Сатираев:Сатираев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
ТӀалхӏатов:ТӀалхӏатов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Хидиров:Хидиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Ющенков:Ющенков NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Шагьмурадов:Шагьмурадов NP-COG-OV ; # ""

Ахӏмадилов:Ахӏмадилов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мухӏамадтӏагьиров:Мухӏамадтӏагьиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Ахӏмаднабиев:Ахӏмаднабиев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Зайналов:Зайналов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мухӏамадтӏагьиров:Мухӏамадтӏагьиров NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Махӏачев:Махӏачев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Дарбишев:Дарбишев NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Даниялов:Даниялов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Громов:Громов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Мажидов:Мажидов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
Салихӏов:Салихӏов NP-COG-OV ; # ""
